Utah, session 2026, HB577.
Section 1. Section 78B-3-1301 is enacted to read:3. Civil Actions13. Civil Action for Deprivation of Federal Constitutional Rights78B-3-1301. Civil action for deprivation of federal constitutional rights under color of law.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person who is a citizen of this state or within the jurisdiction of this state, and is injured by an individual described in Subsection (1)(b), has a right of action against the individual described in Subsection (1)(b) for the relief described in Subsection (2).(b)An individual who is acting as an employee or agent of a federal, state, or local governmental entity, and who, under color of any statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage, of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state, subjects, or causes to be subjected, any citizen of this state, or any person within the jurisdiction of this state, to the deprivation of any rights, privileges, or immunities secured by the United States Constitution, is liable to the injured party.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a person described in Subsection (1)(a) who is injured by an individual described in Subsection (1)(b) may be awarded compensatory damages, equitable relief, and reasonable attorney fees and costs.(b)A person may not recover punitive damages in an action brought under this section.(3)A person does not have a right of action under this section if the person could seek relief against an individual described in Subsection (1)(b) under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1983 or any other statutory scheme that provides a right of action for relief based on the violation of a federal constitutional right.(4)Unless required by the United States Constitution, a right of action under this section abrogates any and all immunities otherwise available to the individual described in Subsection (1)(b).(5)This section does not:(a)authorize a right of action against a federal, state, or local entity; or(b)regulate, restrict, or impose liability on a federal, state, or local entity.(6)This section only applies to a right of action that accrues on or after May 6, 2026.(7)The provisions of this section are severable, and if any subsection of this section or the application of any subsection to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a final decision of a court with jurisdiction, the remainder of this section shall be given effect without the invalid subsection or application.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.